Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.185

Attorney serving as guardian ad litem—Disqualification as judge pro tempore or commissioner pro tempore—Circumstances.

An attorney may not serve as a superior court judge pro tempore or a superior court commissioner pro tempore in a judicial district while appointed to or serving on a case in that judicial district as a guardian ad litem for compensation under Title 11, 13, or 26 RCW, if that judicial district is contained within division one or two of the court of appeals and has a population of more than one hundred thousand.

[ 1996 c 249 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—1996 c 249: See note following RCW 2.56.030.